Utah statutes.
75-5-412.   Terms and requirements of bonds.
(1) The following requirements and provisions apply to any bond required under
Section 75-5-411:
(a)  Unless otherwise provided by the terms of the approved bond, sureties are
jointly and severally liable with the conservator and with each other;
(b)  By executing an approved bond of a conservator, the surety consents to
the jurisdiction of the court which issued letters to the primary obligor in
any proceeding pertaining to the fiduciary duties of the conservator and
naming the surety as a party defendant. Notice of the proceeding shall be
delivered to the surety or mailed to him by registered or certified mail at
his address as listed with the court where the bond is filed and to his
address as then known to the petitioner;
(c)  On petition of a successor conservator or any interested person, a
proceeding may be initiated against a surety for breach of the obligation of
the bond of the conservator;
(d)  The bond of the conservator is not void after the first recovery but may
be proceeded against from time to time until the whole penalty is exhausted.
(2)  No proceeding may be commenced against the surety on any matter as to
which an action or proceeding against the primary obligor is barred by
adjudication or limitation under this code.
